Hawaii statutes.
[§503B-9] Liabilities; limitations on;
official bond. (a) In the performance of a commissioned act, a
commissioner's liability shall be limited to a failure by the commissioner to
perform properly the actions required for oaths, acknowledgments, and proofs of
execution. The commissioner's liability shall not be based on statements in a
document apart from the commissioner's certificate.

(b) For the official misconduct or neglect of
a commissioner or breach of any of the conditions of the commissioner's
official bond, the commissioner and the surety on the commissioner's official
bond shall be liable to the party injured thereby for all the damages
sustained. The party shall have a right of action in the party's own name upon
the bond and may prosecute the action to final judgment and execution. The
liability of the surety shall not exceed the amount of the bond issued to the
commissioner of deeds for whom the bond was issued. [L 2013, c 277, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next